Nebraska, session 109, LB315.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 21-301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-301 (1) Each domestic corporation subject to the Nebraska Model
Business Corporation Act shall deliver a biennial report to the Secretary
of State, as of January 1 of each even-numbered year before January 1,
2026, in such form as the Secretary of State may prescribe. The report
shall be signed by one of the following: The president, a vice president,
a secretary, or a treasurer of the corporation. The signature may be
digital or electronic if it conforms to section 86-611. The report and
occupation tax shall be delivered to the Secretary of State. The report
and occupation tax shall be due on March 1 of each even-numbered year
before January 1, 2026, and shall become delinquent if not filed and paid
by April 15 of each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026. If the
Secretary of State finds that such report and occupation tax conform to
the requirements of the law, the Secretary of State shall file the
report. If the Secretary of State finds that the report or occupation tax
does not conform, the Secretary of State shall not file the report or
accept the occupation tax but shall return the report and occupation tax
to the corporation for any necessary corrections. A correction or
amendment to the report may be filed at any time.
(2) In each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026, the Secretary
of State shall cause a notice to be sent either by United States mail or
electronically transmitted to each corporation for which a report and
occupation tax as described in this section have not been received as of
March 1. The notice shall state that the report has not been received,
that the report and occupation tax are due on March 1, and that the
corporation will be administratively dissolved if the report and proper
occupation tax are not received by April 15.
Sec. 2. Section 21-303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-303 (1) Upon the delivery of the biennial report required under
-2-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
section 21-301 to the Secretary of State, it shall be the duty of every
corporation for profit, registered in the office of the Secretary of
State on January 1, whether incorporated under the laws of this state or
incorporated under the laws of any other state when such corporations
have domesticated in this state pursuant to section 21-2,220.01, to pay
to the Secretary of State an occupation tax in each even-numbered
calendar year before January 1, 2026, beginning January 1, which
occupation tax shall be due and assessable on such date and delinquent if
not paid on or before April 15 of each even-numbered year before January
1, 2026.
(2) The occupation tax shall be as follows: When the paid-up capital
stock of a corporation does not exceed ten thousand dollars, an
occupation tax of twenty-six dollars; when such paid-up capital stock
exceeds ten thousand dollars but does not exceed twenty thousand dollars,
an occupation tax of forty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock
exceeds twenty thousand dollars but does not exceed thirty thousand
dollars, an occupation tax of sixty dollars; when such paid-up capital
stock exceeds thirty thousand dollars but does not exceed forty thousand
dollars, an occupation tax of eighty dollars; when such paid-up capital
stock exceeds forty thousand dollars but does not exceed fifty thousand
dollars, an occupation tax of one hundred dollars; when such paid-up
capital stock exceeds fifty thousand dollars but does not exceed sixty
thousand dollars, an occupation tax of one hundred twenty dollars; when
such paid-up capital stock exceeds sixty thousand dollars but does not
exceed seventy thousand dollars, an occupation tax of one hundred forty
dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds seventy thousand dollars
but does not exceed eighty thousand dollars, an occupation tax of one
hundred sixty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds eighty
thousand dollars but does not exceed ninety thousand dollars, an
occupation tax of one hundred eighty dollars; when such paid-up capital
stock exceeds ninety thousand dollars but does not exceed one hundred
-3-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
thousand dollars, an occupation tax of two hundred dollars; when such
paid-up capital stock exceeds one hundred thousand dollars but does not
exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, an occupation tax of two
hundred forty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds one
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars but does not exceed one hundred
fifty thousand dollars, an occupation tax of two hundred eighty dollars;
when such paid-up capital stock exceeds one hundred fifty thousand
dollars but does not exceed one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, an
occupation tax of three hundred twenty dollars; when such paid-up capital
stock exceeds one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars but does not
exceed two hundred thousand dollars, an occupation tax of three hundred
sixty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds two hundred
thousand dollars but does not exceed two hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars, an occupation tax of four hundred dollars; when such paid-up
capital stock exceeds two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars but does
not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars, an occupation tax of four
hundred forty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds two
hundred fifty thousand dollars but does not exceed two hundred seventy-
five thousand dollars, an occupation tax of four hundred eighty dollars;
when such paid-up capital stock exceeds two hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars but does not exceed three hundred thousand dollars, an occupation
tax of five hundred twenty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock
exceeds three hundred thousand dollars but does not exceed three hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars, an occupation tax of five hundred sixty
dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds three hundred twenty-
five thousand dollars but does not exceed three hundred fifty thousand
dollars, an occupation tax of six hundred dollars; when such paid-up
capital stock exceeds three hundred fifty thousand dollars but does not
exceed four hundred thousand dollars, an occupation tax of six hundred
sixty-six dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds four hundred
thousand dollars but does not exceed four hundred fifty thousand dollars,
-4-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
an occupation tax of seven hundred thirty dollars; when such paid-up
capital stock exceeds four hundred fifty thousand dollars but does not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars, an occupation tax of eight hundred
dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds five hundred thousand
dollars but does not exceed six hundred thousand dollars, an occupation
tax of nine hundred ten dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds
six hundred thousand dollars but does not exceed seven hundred thousand
dollars, an occupation tax of one thousand ten dollars; when such paid-up
capital stock exceeds seven hundred thousand dollars but does not exceed
eight hundred thousand dollars, an occupation tax of one thousand one
hundred twenty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds eight
hundred thousand dollars but does not exceed nine hundred thousand
dollars, an occupation tax of one thousand two hundred thirty dollars;
when such paid-up capital stock exceeds nine hundred thousand dollars but
does not exceed one million dollars, an occupation tax of one thousand
three hundred thirty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds one
million dollars but does not exceed ten million dollars, an occupation
tax of one thousand three hundred thirty dollars, and eight hundred
dollars additional for each million or fraction thereof over and above
one million dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds ten million
dollars but does not exceed fifteen million dollars, an occupation tax of
twelve thousand dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds fifteen
million dollars but does not exceed twenty million dollars, an occupation
tax of fourteen thousand six hundred sixty dollars; when such paid-up
capital stock exceeds twenty million dollars but does not exceed twenty-
five million dollars, an occupation tax of seventeen thousand three
hundred thirty dollars; when such paid-up capital stock exceeds twenty-
five million dollars but does not exceed fifty million dollars, an
occupation tax of twenty thousand six hundred sixty dollars; when such
paid-up capital stock exceeds fifty million dollars but does not exceed
one hundred million dollars, an occupation tax of twenty-one thousand
-5-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
three hundred thirty dollars; and when such paid-up capital stock exceeds
one hundred million dollars, an occupation tax of twenty-three thousand
nine hundred ninety dollars. The minimum occupation tax for filing such
report shall be twenty-six dollars. For purposes of determining the
occupation tax, the stock of corporations incorporated under the laws of
any other state, which corporations have domesticated in this state
pursuant to section 21-2,220.01 and which stock is without par value,
shall be deemed to have a par value of an amount equal to the amount paid
in as capital for such shares at the time of the issuance thereof.
Sec. 3. Section 21-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-304 (1) Each foreign corporation subject to the Nebraska Model
Business Corporation Act, doing business in this state, owning or using a
part or all of its capital or plant in this state, and subject to
compliance with all other provisions of law shall, in addition to all
other statements required by law, deliver a biennial report to the
Secretary of State, as of January 1 of each even-numbered year, in such
form as the Secretary of State may prescribe. The report shall be signed
by one of the following: The president, a vice president, a secretary
before January 1, 2026, or a treasurer of the corporation. The signature
may be digital or electronic if it conforms to section 86-611. The report
and occupation tax shall be delivered to the Secretary of State. The
report and occupation tax shall be due on March 1 of each even-numbered
year and shall become delinquent if not filed and paid by April 15 of
each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026. If the Secretary of State
finds that such report and occupation tax conform to the requirements of
the law, the Secretary of State shall file the report. If the Secretary
of State finds that the report or occupation tax does not conform, the
Secretary of State shall not file the report or accept the occupation tax
but shall return the report and occupation tax to the corporation for any
necessary corrections. A correction or amendment to the report may be
-6-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
filed at any time.
(2) In each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026, the Secretary
of State shall cause a notice to be sent either by United States mail or
electronically transmitted to each corporation for which a report and
occupation tax as described in this section have not been received as of
March 1. The notice shall state that the report has not been received,
that the report and occupation tax are due on March 1, and that the
authority of the corporation to transact business in this state will be
administratively revoked if the report and proper occupation tax are not
received by April 15 of each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. Section 21-306, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-306 Upon the delivery of the biennial report required under
section 21-304 to the Secretary of State, it shall be the duty of every
foreign corporation doing business in this state to pay to the Secretary
of State an occupation tax each even-numbered calendar year before
January 1, 2026, beginning January 1 and become due and assessable on
March 1 of that year and become delinquent if not paid by April 15 of
each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026. The occupation tax shall
be measured by the property employed by the foreign corporation in the
conduct of its business in this state. For such purpose the property
shall consist of the sum total of the actual value of all real estate and
personal property employed in this state by such foreign corporation in
the transaction of its business. The occupation tax to be paid by such
foreign corporation shall be based upon the sum so determined and shall
be considered the capital stock of such foreign corporation in this state
for the purpose of the occupation tax. The schedule of payment shall be
double the occupation tax set forth in section 21-303, or any amendments
thereto, except that the occupation tax shall not exceed thirty thousand
dollars, and the Secretary of State, or any person deputized by the
Secretary of State, shall have authority to investigate and obtain
-7-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
information from such corporation or any state, county, or city official.
Such officers are authorized by this section to furnish such information
to the Secretary of State, or anyone deputized by the Secretary of State,
in order to determine all facts and give effect to the collection of the
occupation tax.
Sec. 5. Section 21-313, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-313 (1) If a domestic corporation required to deliver the
biennial report and pay the occupation tax prescribed in sections 21-301
to 21-330 fails or neglects to deliver such report or pay such occupation
tax by April 15 of each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026, such
corporation shall be administratively dissolved on April 16 of such year.
(2) If a foreign corporation required to deliver the biennial report
and pay the occupation tax prescribed in sections 21-301 to 21-330 fails
or neglects to deliver such report or pay such occupation tax by April 15
of each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026, the authority of such
corporation to transact business in this state shall be administratively
revoked on April 16 of such year.
Sec. 6. Section 21-323, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-323 (1) Prior to January 1 of each even-numbered year before
January 1, 2026, the Secretary of State shall cause to be mailed by
first-class mail to the last-named and appointed registered agent at the
last-named street address of the registered office of each domestic
corporation subject to sections 21-301 to 21-330 a notice stating that on
or before March 1 of each even-numbered year occupation taxes are due to
be paid and a properly executed and signed biennial report is due to be
filed. If such occupation taxes are not paid and the report is not filed
by April 15 of each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026, (a) such
taxes and report shall become delinquent, (b) the delinquent corporation
shall be administratively dissolved on April 16 of such year for
-8-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
nonpayment of occupation taxes and failure to file the report, and (c)
the delinquent occupation tax shall be a lien upon the assets of the
corporation subsequent only to state, county, and municipal taxes.
(2) Upon the failure of any domestic corporation to pay its
occupation tax and deliver the biennial report within the time limited by
sections 21-301 to 21-330, the Secretary of State shall on April 16 of
such year administratively dissolve the corporation for nonpayment of
taxes and make such entry and showing upon the records of his or her
office.
(3)(a) The Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve a
corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the
ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary
of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on
the corporation under section 21-236.
(b) A corporation administratively dissolved continues its corporate
existence but may not carry on any business, except that business
necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under section
21-2,188 and notify claimants under sections 21-2,189 and 21-2,190.
(c) The administrative dissolution of a corporation shall not
terminate the authority of its registered agent.
(4) All delinquent occupation taxes of the corporation shall be a
lien upon the assets of the corporation, subsequent only to state,
county, and municipal taxes.
(5) No domestic corporation shall be voluntarily dissolved until all
occupation taxes and fees due to or assessable by the state have been
paid and the biennial report filed by such corporation.
Sec. 7. Section 21-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-325 (1) Prior to January 1 of each even-numbered year before
January 1, 2026, the Secretary of State shall cause to be mailed by
first-class mail to the last-known address of each foreign corporation
-9-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
subject to sections 21-301 to 21-330 a notice stating that on or before
March 1 of each even-numbered year occupation taxes are due to be paid
and a properly executed and signed biennial report is due to be filed. If
such occupation taxes are not paid and the report is not filed by April
15 of each even-numbered year before January 1, 2026, (a) such taxes and
report shall become delinquent, (b) the authority of the delinquent
corporation to transact business in this state shall be administratively
revoked on April 16 of such year for nonpayment of occupation taxes and
failure to file the report, and (c) the delinquent occupation tax shall
be a lien upon the assets of the corporation subject only to state,
county, and municipal taxes.
(2) Upon the failure of any foreign corporation to pay its
occupation tax and deliver the biennial report within the time limited by
sections 21-301 to 21-330, the Secretary of State shall on April 16 of
such year administratively revoke the authority of the corporation to
transact business in this state for nonpayment of taxes and shall bar the
corporation from doing business in this state under the corporation laws
of this state and make such entry and showing upon the records of his or
her office.
(3)(a) The Secretary of State shall administratively revoke the
authority of a foreign corporation by signing a certificate of revocation
of authority to transact business in this state that recites the ground
or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State
shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the
foreign corporation under section 21-2,212.
(b) The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in
this state shall cease on the date shown on the certificate revoking its
certificate of authority.
(c) Revocation of a foreign corporation's certificate of authority
shall not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the
corporation.
-10-

LB315 LB315
2025 2025
(4) All delinquent corporation occupation taxes of the foreign
corporation shall be a lien upon the assets of the corporation within the
state, subsequent only to state, county, and municipal taxes. Nothing in
sections 21-322 to 21-330 shall be construed to allow a foreign
corporation to do business in this state without complying with the laws
of this state.
(5) No foreign corporation shall be voluntarily withdrawn until all
occupation taxes due to or assessable by this state have been paid and
the biennial report filed by such corporation.
Sec. 8. Original sections 21-301, 21-303, 21-304, 21-306, 21-313,
21-323, and 21-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-11-